Utah statutes.
16-16-1402.   Application for certificate of authority.

(1)  A foreign cooperative may apply for a certificate of authority by delivering an application to the division for filing.  The application shall state:

(a)  the name of the foreign cooperative and, if the name does not comply with Section 16-16-111, an alternative name adopted pursuant to Section 16-16-1405;

(b)  the name of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law the foreign cooperative is organized;

(c)  the street address and, if different, mailing address of the principal office and, if the law of the jurisdiction under which the foreign cooperative is organized requires the foreign cooperative to maintain another office in that jurisdiction, the street address and, if different, mailing address of the required office;

(d)  the street address and, if different, mailing address of the foreign cooperative's designated office in this state, and the name of the foreign cooperative's agent for service of process at the designated office; and

(e)  the name, street address and, if different, mailing address of each of the foreign cooperative's current directors and officers.

(2)  A foreign cooperative shall deliver with a completed application under Subsection (1) a certificate of good standing or a similar record signed by the division or other official having custody of the foreign cooperative's publicly filed records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law the foreign cooperative is organized.

